Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2209
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the E-15 Access Standard Act is to increase consumer access to E-15 gasoline through the establishment of an access standard.

Laws 2023, LB562, § 2.